Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 6. Prohibited Activities.

Sec. 10.13.610.
Misrepresentation.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

10.13.120

, a person transacting business in the state who is not a licensee may not knowingly use a name or title that indicates that the person is a BIDCO or otherwise represent that the person is a BIDCO or a licensee.

A licensee may not knowingly misrepresent the meaning or effect of its license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.620.
Inspection or copying refusal.

A person having custody of all or part of the books, accounts, or other records of a licensee may not knowingly refuse to allow the department, upon request, to inspect or make copies of the records.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.630.
Financing assistance to associates of licensee.

A licensee may not directly or indirectly provide financing assistance to an associate of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.640.
Financing assistance to discharge obligation to associate of licensee.

A licensee may not directly or indirectly provide financing assistance to discharge, or to free money for use in discharging, part or all of an obligation to an associate of the licensee. This section does not apply to a transaction of an associate of a licensee in the normal course of the associate’s business involving a line of credit or financing assistance with a term of not more than five years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.650.
Contemporaneous financing assistance.

If the terms on which a licensee provides financing assistance to a business are less favorable to the licensee than the terms on which an associate of the licensee provides financing assistance to the business, the licensee may not directly or indirectly provide the assistance to the business within one year before or after the associate provides assistance.

If the financing assistance provided by the licensee’s associate is of a different kind from the financing assistance provided by the licensee, the burden is on the licensee to prove that the terms on which the licensee provided the financing assistance were at least as favorable to the licensee as the terms on which the associate provided the assistance.

This section does not apply

if the associate is a controlling person of the licensee and is also the only shareholder of the licensee;

if the associate is a subsidiary of the licensee;

to a transaction of an associate of a licensee in the normal course of the associate’s business involving either a line of credit or financing assistance with a term of not more than five years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.660.
Compensation of associate.

An associate of a licensee may not directly or indirectly receive from a person to whom the licensee provides financing assistance

compensation in connection with the providing of the financing assistance; or

other things of value for procuring, influencing, or attempting to procure or influence the licensee’s action with respect to providing the financing assistance.

This section does not apply to the receipt of fees by an associate of a licensee for bona fide services performed by the associate if

the associate, with the consent and knowledge of the person to whom the financing assistance is provided, is designated by the licensee to perform the services;

the services are appropriate and necessary under the circumstances;

the fees for the services are approved as reasonable by the licensee; and

the fees for the services are collected by the licensee, and the licensee pays the associate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.670.
Exemptions.

If the department finds that the exemption is in the public interest and that the regulation of the person or transaction is not necessary for the purposes of this chapter, the department may exempt a person or transaction from AS

10.13.630

—

10.13.660

for the purposes of a particular transaction.

The exemption may be unconditional or upon specified terms and conditions and for specified periods.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)